test/src/gt-desc-yamls/N-laiwh14_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - laiõh: # Noun (14) laiõh 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     laiõh+N+Sg+Nom: laiõh
     laiõh+N+Sg+Gen: laidõ
     laiõh+N+Sg+Par: laiõht
     laiõh+N+Sg+Ill: [laidõhe, laidõdõ]
     laiõh+N+Sg+Ine: [laidõn, laidõh, laidõhn]
     laiõh+N+Sg+Ela: laidõst
     laiõh+N+Sg+All: laidõlõ
     laiõh+N+Sg+Ade: laidõl
     laiõh+N+Sg+Abl: laidõlt
     laiõh+N+Sg+Tra: laidõs
     laiõh+N+Sg+Ter: laidõniq
     laiõh+N+Sg+Abe: laidõldaq
     laiõh+N+Sg+Com: laidõgaq
     laiõh+N+Pl+Nom: laidõq
     laiõh+N+Pl+Gen: [laididõ, laidiidõ, laiõhtõ]
     laiõh+N+Pl+Par: [laidit, laidiid]
     laiõh+N+Pl+Ill: [laidihe, laidiihe, laididõ, laidiidõ, laiõhtõhe, laiõhtõdõ]
     laiõh+N+Pl+Ine: [laidin, laidiin, laidih, laidiih, laidihn, laidiihn, laiõhtõn, laiõhtõh, laiõhtõhn]
     laiõh+N+Pl+Ela: [laidist, laidiist, laiõhtõst]
     laiõh+N+Pl+All: [laidilõ, laidiilõ, laiõhtõlõ]
     laiõh+N+Pl+Ade: [laidil, laidiil, laiõhtõl]
     laiõh+N+Pl+Abl: [laidilt, laidiilt, laiõhtõlt]
     laiõh+N+Pl+Tra: [laidis, laidiis, laiõhtõs]
     laiõh+N+Pl+Ter: [laidiniq, laidiiniq, laiõhtõniq]
     laiõh+N+Pl+Abe: [laidildaq, laidiildaq, laiõhtõldaq]
     laiõh+N+Pl+Com: [laididõgaq, laidiidõgaq, laiõhtõgaq]
